Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3513
Act; how construed.

The Surgical First Assistant Practice Act shall not be construed to:

(1) Prohibit any nurse practitioner, registered nurse, physician, or physician assistant credentialed to practice under the Uniform Credentialing Act from engaging in the practice for which he or she is credentialed; or

(2) Prohibit any student enrolled in a bona fide surgical first assistant training program recognized by the board from performing those duties which are necessary for the student's course of study, if the duties are performed under the personal supervision of a physician.

Laws 2016, LB721, § 13.